data/tr_reference.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ѫ Y 129
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüz/ѡ [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzü [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüze [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzden/ѡ [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzle/ѡ [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydi [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydim [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydik [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydiniz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeydiler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymiş [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymişim [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymişsin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymişiz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymişsiniz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeymişler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyse [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeysem [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeysen [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeysek [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyseniz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyseler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyim [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdesin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyiz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdesiniz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdedir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdedirler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdelerdir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyken [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyimdir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdesindir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeyizdir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdesinizdir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdeki [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilere [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerce [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekileri [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerini [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerine [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerinde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerinden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekileriyle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekilerinin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekini [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekine [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekinde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekinden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekinin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiyle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiyse [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekidir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiydi [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiymiş [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzdekiyken [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzün [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündü [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündüm [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündün [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündük [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündünüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündüler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntü [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntüm [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntün [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntük [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntünüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntüler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüş [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüşüm [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüşsün [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüşüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüşsünüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünmüşler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünse [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsem [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsen [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsek [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünseniz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünseler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünüm [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsün [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsünüz [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzündürler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzüntürler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünlerdir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünken [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünümdür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsündür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünüzdür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünsünüzdür [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünki [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiler [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilere [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerce [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkileri [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerini [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerine [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerinde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerinden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkileriyle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkilerinin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkini [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkine [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkinde [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkinden [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkinin [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiyle [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiyse [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkidir [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiydi [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiymiş [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѫ 0 'ünüzünkiyken [^aeıioöuü]
SFX ѭ Y 39
SFX ѭ 0 'di [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'dim [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'din [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'dik [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'diniz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'diler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'ti [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tim [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tin [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tik [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tiniz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tiler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'miş [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'mişim [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'mişsin [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'mişiz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'mişsiniz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'mişler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'se [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sem [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sen [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sek [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'seniz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'seler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'im [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sin [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'iz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'siniz [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'ler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'dir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'dirler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'tirler [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'lerdir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'ken [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'imdir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sindir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'izdir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
SFX ѭ 0 'sinizdir [öü][^ıiaeöoüu]
